Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Nursing.

Sec. 08.68.010.
Creation and membership of Board of Nursing.

There is created a Board of Nursing, consisting of seven members appointed by the governor as follows:

one member shall be a licensed practical nurse who is currently engaged in licensed practical nursing and has practiced for at least two years immediately preceding appointment;

one member shall be a registered nurse engaged in nursing education at the associate, baccalaureate, or graduate degree level at an institution that holds national nursing accreditation;

one member shall be an advanced practice registered nurse who is currently engaged in advanced practice registered nursing and has practiced for at least four years immediately preceding appointment;

two members shall be registered nurses at large who are currently engaged in registered nursing and have practiced for at least four years immediately preceding appointment; and

two members shall be persons who have no direct financial interest in the health care industry.

History.

(§ 3 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1973; am § 15 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, rewrote the section, which read, “There is created a Board of Nursing, consisting of seven members appointed by the governor. One member shall be a licensed practical nurse currently involved in institutional nursing service, one member shall be a registered nurse engaged in baccalaureate nursing education, three members shall be registered nurses at large, and two members shall be persons who have no direct financial interest in the health care industry.”

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (3), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” and inserted “registered” between “practice” and “nursing”.

Secs. 08.68.020,
08.68.030.
Term of office; limitation on term of service. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.035.]

Sec. 08.68.040.
Source of appointments. [Repealed, § 46 ch 102 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 08.68.050.
Removal of board members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.020.]

Sec. 08.68.060.
Qualifications of registered nurse and licensed practical nurse board members. [Repealed, § 15 ch 29 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 08.68.070.
Election of officers.

The board shall annually elect a chairman and secretary from among its members.

History.

(§ 5 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 4 ch 14 SLA 1982)

Sec. 08.68.080.
Meetings.

The board shall meet at least four times a year.

History.

(§ 5 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 14 SLA 1982)

Sec. 08.68.090.
Quorum.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.

History.

(§ 5 ch 90 SLA 1957)

Sec. 08.68.100.
Duties and powers of board.

The board shall

adopt regulations necessary to implement this chapter, including regulations

pertaining to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse, including requirements for an advanced practice registered nurse to practice as a certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, or certified nurse midwife; regulations for an advanced practice registered nurse who holds a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number must address training in pain management and opioid use and addiction;

necessary to implement AS

08.68.331

—

08.68.336

relating to certified nurse aides in order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of clients served by nurse aides;

pertaining to retired nurse status; and

establishing criteria for approval of practical nurse education programs that are not accredited by a national nursing accrediting body;

approve curricula and adopt standards for basic education programs that prepare persons for licensing under AS

08.68.190

;

provide for surveys of the basic nursing education programs in the state at the times it considers necessary;

approve education programs that meet the requirements of this chapter and of the board, and deny, revoke, or suspend approval of education programs for failure to meet the requirements;

examine, license, and renew the licenses of qualified applicants;

prescribe requirements for competence before a former registered, advanced practice registered, or licensed practical nurse may resume the practice of nursing under this chapter;

define by regulation the qualifications and duties of the executive administrator and delegate authority to the executive administrator that is necessary to conduct board business;

develop reasonable and uniform standards for nursing practice;

publish advisory opinions regarding whether nursing practice procedures or policies comply with acceptable standards of nursing practice as defined under this chapter;

require applicants under this chapter to submit fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check; the department shall submit the fingerprints and fees to the Department of Public Safety for a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

;

require that a licensed advanced practice registered nurse who has a federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number register with the controlled substance prescription database under AS

17.30.200(n)

.

The board may

conduct hearings upon charges of alleged violations of this chapter or regulations adopted under it;

invoke, or request the department to invoke, disciplinary action against a licensee;

prescribe requirements for competence to continue practice.

History.

(§ 6(1),(2),(3) ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 6 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 10 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 5 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 19 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor's notes. —

Former paragraphs (a)(8)-(10) were renumbered as (a)(7)-(9) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (a)(7).

Administrative Code. —

For nursing education of registered and practical nurses, see 12 AAC 44, art. 1.

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

For advanced nurse practitioner, see 12 AAC 44, art. 4.

For registered nurse anesthetists, see 12 AAC 44, art. 5.

For continuing competency, see 12 AAC 44, art. 6.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (a)(1)(A), inserted “certified registered” preceding “nurse anesthetist”, in (a)(1)(B) deleted “, and regulations” preceding “necessary to implement”, added (a)(1)(C) and (a)(1)(D), in (a)(7) twice substituted “administrator” for “secretary”, and made related changes.

The first 2016 amendment, effective July 17, 2017, added paragraph (a)(11).

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “practice registered nurse, including requirements for an advanced practice registered nurse to practice as a certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, or certified nurse midwife” for “advanced nurse practitioner and a certified registered nurse anesthetist”, and, in (a)(6), inserted “registered, advanced practice registered, or licensed practical” following “former”.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(1)(A), added “regulations for an advanced practice registered nurse who holds a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number must address training in pain management and opioid use and addition:”; in (a)(11), substituted “licensed advanced practice registered nurse” for “licensed advanced nurse practitioner”.

Editor's notes. —

The delayed repeal of paragraph (a)(11) of this section by sec. 52,
ch. 25, SLA 2016, which was to take effect July 1, 2021, was repealed by sec. 47,
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017.

Sec. 08.68.110.
Appointment of executive officer. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.68.111.
Executive administrator of the board.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, in consultation with the board, shall employ a licensed registered nurse who holds, at a minimum, a master’s degree in nursing and who is not a member of the board to serve as executive administrator of the board.

The executive administrator shall perform duties as prescribed by the board.

[Repealed by § 29 ch 14 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed by § 1 ch 129 SLA 1974.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 49 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 7, 29 ch 14 SLA 1982; am §§ 3, 4 ch 29 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (a), inserted “who holds, at a minimum, a master’s degree in nursing and” following “registered nurse”, and substituted “administrator” for “secretary”; in (b), substituted “administrator” for “secretary”.

Secs. 08.68.120 — 08.68.130.
Bond; disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 3 ch 59 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 08.68.140.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as specified in AS

08.68.333(f)

, the board shall comply with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 2 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.68.150.
Expenses.

Members of the board are entitled to the per diem and travel expenses allowed by law.

History.

(§ 7 ch 90 SLA 1957)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.